Wyoming, session 2025, HB0189.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-2-321 is created to read:

6-2-321. Sexual communication with minors; penalties;
civil cause of action; social media prohibition.

(a) As used in this section:
HB0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0248

(i) "Obscene" means any communication that
includes any of the following when directed at a minor:

(A) Explicit descriptions of sexual
conduct;

(B) Descriptions of sexual arousal;

(C) Requests for sexual images or sexual
discussions;

(D) Sexualized descriptions of human bodies
or body parts;

(E) Attempts to normalize sexual contact
between adults and minors;

(F) Behaviors intended to desensitize
minors to sexual content inappropriate for the minor's age
based on:

(I) The minor's developmental stage;
HB0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0248

(II) Lack of parental consent or
knowledge of the discussions;

(III) The context of the
communication;

(IV) Any ongoing pattern of sexual
content.

(ii) "Pattern of communication" means two (2) or
more separate instances of communication that:

(A) Are directed toward the same minor or
purported minor; and

(B) May occur across any combination of
written, electronic or verbal communication.

(iii) "Personal sexual gratification" means
communication intended to:

(A) Arouse or appeal to sexual desires;
HB0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0248

(B) Obtain sexual arousal or pleasure;

(C) Elicit sexual responses or reactions;

(D) Create or share sexually explicit
content;

(E) Engage in sexually explicit role play.

(b) Except under circumstances constituting a
violation of W.S. 6-2-318, a person is guilty of sexual
communication with a minor if the person is not less than
eighteen (18) years old or older and knowingly engages in a
pattern of written, electronic or verbal communication:

(i) With a person less than the age of eighteen
(18) years, or a person purported to be less than the age
of eighteen (18) years;

(ii) Where the actor is more than four (4) years
older than the victim;

HB0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0248
(iii) Where the communication includes obscene
verbal or written descriptions or obscene images; and

(iv) When the actor engages in the pattern of
communication for the purpose of personal sexual
gratification.

(c) A person convicted under subsection (b) of this
section shall be punished as follows:

(i) A first offense is a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than five (5) years and a fine of
not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and not more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00);

(ii) A second offense is a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years and a fine of
not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00);

(iii) A third or subsequent offense is a felony
punishable by imprisonment for not more than twenty (20)
years and a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00).
HB0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0248

(d) Persons convicted under this section may be
prohibited from using social media during any period of
incarceration, probation or parole.

(e) Persons convicted under this section shall be
subject to forfeiture of the devices they used to
communicate with minors.

(f) A victim shall have a cause of action against the
actor in a court of competent jurisdiction for damages and
any other relief the court deems reasonable.

(g) This section shall not apply to any person who
communicates or instructs about sexual matters in the
course of a bona fide school, college or university
activities or in the course of employment of such an
organization.

Section 2. W.S. 7-19-302(g) is amended to read:

7-19-302. Registration of offenders; procedure;
verification; fees.
HB0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0248

(g) For an offender convicted of a violation of W.S.
6-2-316(a)(i) and (iv), 6-2-321, 6-2-705, 6-4-303(b)(iv) or
6-4-304(b) if the victim was a minor, 18 U.S.C. §§ 2252B,
2252C, 2424 and 2425, an offense in another jurisdiction
containing the same or similar elements, or arising out of
the same or similar facts or circumstances as a criminal
offense specified in this subsection or an attempt or
conspiracy to commit any of the offenses specified in this
subsection, the division shall annually verify the accuracy
of the offender's registered address, and the offender
shall annually report, in person, his current address to
the sheriff in the county in which the offender resides,
during the period in which he is required to register.
During the annual in-person verification, the sheriff shall
photograph the offender. Confirmation of the in-person
verification required under this subsection, along with the
photograph of the offender, shall be transmitted by the
sheriff to the division within three (3) working days. Any
person under this subsection who has not established a
residence or is transient, and who is reporting to the
sheriff as required under subsection (e) of this section,
HB0189

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0248
shall be deemed in compliance with the address verification
requirements of this section.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0189